Idaho, session 2025, H0469.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department for the
Contract Construction and Right-of-Way Acquisition Program $20,000,000
from the Transportation Expansion and Congestion Mitigation Fund to be ex-
pended for capital outlay for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.